District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.171

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Chief Financial Officer” means the Chief Financial Officer established by § 1-204.24(a).

(2)

“DMPED” means the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development established by Mayor’s Order 99-62 (April 9, 1999).

(3)

“Developer Sponsor” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 47-4634(1).

(4)

“H Street Real Property Tax Increment Revenue” means the portion of the real property tax imposed by Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code on real property in the H Street, N.E., Retail Priority Area in any fiscal year that exceeds the amount of the real property tax imposed on the real property in the H Street, N.E., Retail Priority Area in the fiscal year ended September 30, 2007.

(5)

“H Street, N.E., Retail Priority Area” means the H Street, N.E., Retail Priority Area as defined in section 2(2) of the Great Streets Neighborhood Retail Priority Areas Approval Resolution of 2007, effective July 10, 2007(Res. 17-257; 54 DCR 7194).

(6)

“H Street Retail Developer” means a person or corporation that proposes to, or provides technical assistance to, engage in the business of sale of personal property or services for use or consumption by the purchasers at locations in the H Street, N.E., Retail Priority Area.

(7)

“H Street Sales Tax Increment Revenue” means the portion of the sales tax imposed by Chapter 20 of Title 47 on goods and services sold in the H Street, N.E., Retail Priority Area in any fiscal year that exceeds the amount of the sales tax imposed in the H Street, N.E., Retail Priority Area in the fiscal year ended September 30, 2007.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-354, § 2, 58 DCR 754
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 2162(a), 59 DCR 8025
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 2092, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2022(a), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added “or services” in (6).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added “and, after October 1, 2014, the Bladensburg Road, N.E., Retail Priority Area, as defined in § 2-1217.73” at the end of (5).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote (5).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2162(a) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2162(a) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2092 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2092 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2092 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2022(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).